Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.030

Title or description of services.

No person may represent oneself as a certified substance use disorder professional, certified substance use disorder professional trainee, or co-occurring disorder specialist or use any title or description of services of a certified substance use disorder professional, certified substance use disorder professional trainee, or co-occurring disorder specialist without applying for certification, meeting the required qualifications, and being certified by the department of health, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

[ 2019 c 444 s 3; 2008 c 135 s 16; 2000 c 171 s 41; 1998 c 243 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.